Utah statutes.
58-15-3.   Health Facility Administrators Licensing Board.

(1)  There is created a Health Facility Administrators Licensing Board consisting of one administrator from a skilled nursing facility, two administrators from intermediate care facilities, one administrator from an intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded, and one member from the general public.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.  The board, in collaboration with the division, may establish continuing education requirements by rule.  Board members may not receive compensation for their involvement in continuing education programs.

